Utah statutes.
35A-8-413.   Victims of major disaster.

(1) (a)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this or any other law relating to rentals, preferences, or eligibility for admission or occupancy of dwellings in housing projects during the period an authority determines that there is an acute need for housing to assure the availability of dwellings for victims of a major disaster, the authority may undertake the development and administration of housing projects for the federal government.

(b)  Dwellings in any housing project under the jurisdiction of the authority may be made available to victims of a major disaster.

(2)  An authority may contract with the federal government or a public body for advance payment or reimbursement for the furnishing of housing to victims of a major disaster, including the furnishing of housing free of charge to needy disaster victims during any period covered by a determination of acute need by the authority.

